District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2304.11

Refusal, revocation, or suspension of license or certificate

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(h), 33 DCR 729

History

1981 Ed., §§ 2-1704.1 to 2-1704.18.

Prior Codifications